Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,107
Report to Department of Health and Human Services; contents; department; issue public report; failure to file report; late fee; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) Any physician who performs or induces or attempts to perform or induce an abortion shall report to the Department of Health and Human Services, on a schedule and in accordance with forms and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department:

(a) If a determination of probable postfertilization age was made, the probable postfertilization age determined and the method and basis of the determination;

(b) If a determination of probable postfertilization age was not made, the basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed;

(c) If the probable postfertilization age was determined to be consistent with the postfertilization age limits provided in section 71-6915, the basis of the determination that the pregnant woman had a condition which so complicated her medical condition as to necessitate the abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or to avert serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, or the basis of the determination that it was necessary to preserve the life of an unborn child; and

(d) The method used for the abortion and, in the case of an abortion performed when the probable postfertilization age was determined to be consistent with the postfertilization age limits provided in section 71-6915, whether the method of abortion used was one that, in reasonable medical judgment, provided the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive or, if such a method was not used, the basis of the determination that termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk either of the death of the pregnant woman or of the substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the woman than would other available methods.

(2) By June 30 of each year, the department shall issue a public report providing statistics for the previous calendar year compiled from all of the reports covering that year submitted in accordance with this section for each of the items listed in subsection (1) of this section. Each such report shall also provide the statistics for all previous calendar years during which this section was in effect, adjusted to reflect any additional information from late or corrected reports. The department shall take care to ensure that none of the information included in the public reports could reasonably lead to the identification of any pregnant woman upon whom an abortion was performed.

(3) Any physician who fails to submit a report by the end of thirty days following the due date shall be subject to a late fee of five hundred dollars for each additional thirty-day period or portion of a thirty-day period the report is overdue. Any physician required to report in accordance with the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act who has not submitted a report, or has submitted only an incomplete report, more than one year following the due date, may, in an action brought in the manner in which actions are brought to enforce the Uniform Credentialing Act pursuant to section 38-1,139, be directed by a court of competent jurisdiction to submit a complete report within a time period stated by court order or be subject to civil contempt. Failure by any physician to conform to any requirement of this section, other than late filing of a report, constitutes unprofessional conduct pursuant to section 38-2021. Failure by any physician to submit a complete report in accordance with a court order constitutes unprofessional conduct pursuant to section 38-2021. Intentional or reckless falsification of any report required under this section is a Class V misdemeanor.

(4) Within ninety days after October 15, 2010, the department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to assist in compliance with this section.

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 1.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.